tsts-nov19/apertium-tg-fa.fa.metadix
  <!-- conjucation -->
    <pardef n="V__چشید/ن__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یم</l>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>م</l>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ید</l>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ی</l>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ند</l>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ید</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یم</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>م</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ید</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ی</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ند</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>د</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
<!-- End of conjucation -->

<!--auxiliary verbs -->
  <!-- To Be conjucation for contineous -->
		<pardef n="aV__/استن__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ایم</l>
          <r>بودن<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ام</l>
          <r>بودن<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اید</l>
          <r>بودن<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ای</l>
          <r>بودن<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اند</l>
          <r>بودن<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>است</l>
          <r>بودن<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
<!--end of auxiliary verbs -->

    <pardef n="/VERBS">
      <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes" />
        <p>
          <l><prm1/></l>
          <r><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes" />
        <p>
          <l><prm1/>ه</l>
          <r><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space" />
        <par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/>
      </e>
      <!-- Imperative -->
      <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes" />
        <p>
          <l><prm2/></l>
          <r><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes" />
        <p>
          <l><prm2/></l>
          <r><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
        <i><prm3/></i>
        <par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <!-- Present -->
      <e>
        <par n="P__ن" />
        <par n="P__njprefixes" />
        <p>
          <l><prm2/></l>
          <r><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i><prm3/></i>
        <par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes" />
        <p>
          <l><prm2/></l>
          <r><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i><prm3/></i>
        <par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- for verbs begining with vowels -->
    <pardef n="/VERBS_vowel">
      <e>
        <i><prm4/></i>
        <p>
          <l><prm1/></l>
          <r><prm4/><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="P__ن" />
        <par n="P__jnjprefixes" />
        <i><prm4/></i>
        <p>
          <l><prm1/></l>
          <r><prm4/><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="P__jjprefixes" />
        <i><prm5/></i>
        <p>
          <l><prm1/></l>
          <r><prm4/><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i><prm4/></i>
        <p>
          <l><prm1/>ه</l>
          <r><prm4/><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space" />
        <par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="P__ن" />
        <par n="P__jnjprefixes" />
        <i><prm4/></i>
        <p>
          <l><prm1/>ه</l>
          <r><prm4/><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space" />
        <par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="P__jjprefixes" />
        <i><prm5/></i>
        <p>
          <l><prm1/>ه</l>
          <r><prm4/><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space" />
        <par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/>
      </e>
      <!-- Imperative -->
      <e>
        <i><prm4/></i>
        <p>
          <l><prm2/></l>
          <r><prm4/><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes" />
        <i><prm5/></i>
        <p>
          <l><prm2/></l>
          <r><prm4/><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i><prm4/></i>
        <p>
          <l><prm2/></l>
          <r><prm4/><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
        <i><prm3/></i>
        <par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes" />
        <i><prm5/></i>
        <p>
          <l><prm2/></l>
          <r><prm4/><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
        <i><prm3/></i>
        <par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <!-- Present -->
      <e>
        <i><prm4/></i>
        <p>
          <l><prm2/></l>
          <r><prm4/><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i><prm3/></i>
        <par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="P__ن" />
        <par n="P__jnjprefixes" />
        <i><prm4/></i>
        <p>
          <l><prm2/></l>
          <r><prm4/><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i><prm3/></i>
        <par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="P__jjprefixes" />
        <i><prm5/></i>
        <p>
          <l><prm2/></l>
          <r><prm4/><prm1/>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i><prm3/></i>
        <par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

    <e lm="بخشیدن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="بخشید" prm2="بخش" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="بردن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="برد" prm2="بر" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="پالودن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="پالود" prm2="پالا‍" prm3="ی" /></e>
    <e lm="پراکندن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="پراکند" prm2="پراکن" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="پرداختن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="پرداخت" prm2="پرداز" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="پروردن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="پرورد" prm2="پرور" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="پوشاندن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="پوشاند" prm2="پوشان" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="پیمودن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="پیمود" prm2="پیما" prm3="ی" /></e>
    <e lm="تاختن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="تاخت" prm2="تاز" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="تپیدن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="تپید" prm2="تپ" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="چیدن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="چید" prm2="چین" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="خواباندن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="خواباند" prm2="خوابان" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="خوراندن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="خوراند" prm2="خوران" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="خیزاندن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="خیزاند" prm2="خیزان" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="درانیدن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="درانید" prm2="دران" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="راندن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="راند" prm2="ران" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="رفتن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="رفت" prm2="رو" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="ریختن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="ریخت" prm2="ریز" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="زادن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="زاد" prm2="زا" prm3="ی" /></e>
    <e lm="زدودن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="زدود" prm2="زدا" prm3="ی" /></e>
    <e lm="سپردن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="سپرد" prm2="سپر" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="سراییدن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="سرایید" prm2="سرا" prm3="ی" /></e>
    <e lm="سوزاندن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="سوزاند" prm2="سوزان" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="شتافتن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="شتافت" prm2="شتاب" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="شناختن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="شناخت" prm2="شناس" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="شنواندن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="شنواند" prm2="شنوان" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="فرمودن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="فرمود" prm2="فرمای" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="فریفتن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="فریفت" prm2="فریب" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="فشاریدن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="فشارید" prm2="فشار" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="فهمانیدن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="فهمانید" prm2="فهمان" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="کافتن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="کافت" prm2="کاو" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="کاهیدن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="کاهید" prm2="کاهاند" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="کندن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="کند" prm2="کن" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="کوفتن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="کوفت" prm2="کوب" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="گرفتن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="گرفت" prm2="گیر" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="گماشتن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="گماشت" prm2="گمار" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="نازیدن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="نازید" prm2="ناز" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="نواختن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="نواخت" prm2="نواز" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="نیوشاندن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS" prm1="نیوشاند" prm2="نیوشان" prm3="" /></e>
    <e lm="آمدن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS_vowel" prm1="مد" prm2="" prm3="ی" prm4="آ" prm5="یا" /></e>
    <e lm="آزمودن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS_vowel" prm1="زمود" prm2="زما" prm3="ی" prm4="آ" prm5="یا" /></e>
    <e lm="آشامیدن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS_vowel" prm1="شامید" prm2="شام" prm3="" prm4="آ" prm5="یا" /></e>
    <e lm="افراشتن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS_vowel" prm1="فراشت" prm2="فراز" prm3="" prm4="ا" prm5="یا" /></e>
    <e lm="افروختن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS_vowel" prm1="فروخت" prm2="فراز" prm3="" prm4="ا" prm5="یا" /></e>
    <e lm="افروزاندن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS_vowel" prm1="فروزاند" prm2="فروزان" prm3="" prm4="ا" prm5="یا" /></e>
    <e lm="افزودن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS_vowel" prm1="فزود" prm2="فزا" prm3="ی" prm4="ا" prm5="یا" /></e>
    <e lm="افشردن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS_vowel" prm1="فشرد" prm2="فشر" prm3="" prm4="ا" prm5="یا" /></e>
    <e lm="انباشتن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS_vowel" prm1="نباشت" prm2="نبار" prm3="" prm4="ا" prm5="یا" /></e>
    <e lm="اندوختن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS_vowel" prm1="ندوختن" prm2="ندوز" prm3="" prm4="ا" prm5="یا" /></e>
    <e lm="اندودن"><i></i><par n="/VERBS_vowel" prm1="نباشت" prm2="نبار" prm3="" prm4="ا" prm5="یا" /></e>
